New York, session 2025-2026, A11063.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (k-2) of subdivision 2 of section 65.10 of the 2 penal law, as added by section 1 of part VV of chapter 56 of the laws of 3 2020, is amended to read as follows: 4 (k-2) (i) Refrain, upon sentencing for a crime involving unlawful 5 sexual conduct [committed against a metropolitan transportation authori- 6 ty passenger, customer,] or [employee or a crime involving assault 7 against a metropolitan transportation authority employee,] assault 8 committed in or on any place, conveyance, or vehicle used for public 9 transportation or public transit, including subway cars, train cars, 10 buses, ferries, railroad, omnibus, marine or aviation transportation; or 11 any facility used for or [conveyance of the metropolitan transportation 12 authority or a subsidiary thereof or the New York city transit authority 13 or a subsidiary thereof,] in connection with service in the transporta- 14 tion of passengers, airports, train stations, subway and rail 15 stations, and bus terminals from using or entering [any of] such 16 [authority's subways, trains, buses or other conveyances or facilities] 17 public transportation or public transit as specified by the court for a 18 period of up to three years, or a specified period of such probation or 19 conditional discharge, whichever is less. For purposes of this section, 20 a crime involving assault shall mean an offense described in article one 21 hundred twenty of this chapter which has as an element the causing of 22 physical injury or serious physical injury to another as well as the 23 attempt thereof. If the sentence imposed by the court includes a period 24 of incarceration followed by a period of probation or conditional 25 discharge, then the court may impose conditions under this paragraph to 26 be operative only during the period of probation or conditional EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15443-01-6 A. 11063 2 1 discharge. Orders under this paragraph may include public transportation 2 outside the county where the sentencing judge sits. 3 (ii) The court may, in its discretion, suspend, modify or cancel a 4 condition imposed under this paragraph in the interest of justice at any 5 time. If the person depends on [the authority's subways, trains, buses, 6 or other conveyances or facilities] such public transportation or public 7 transit for trips of necessity, including, but not limited to, travel to 8 or from medical or legal appointments, school or training classes or 9 places of employment, obtaining food, clothing or necessary household 10 items, or rendering care to family members, the court may modify such 11 condition to allow for a trip or trips as in its discretion are neces- 12 sary. 13 (iii) A person at liberty and subject to a condition under this para- 14 graph who applies, within thirty days after the date such condition 15 becomes effective, for a refund of any prepaid fare amounts rendered 16 unusable in whole or in part by such condition including, but not limit- 17 ed to, a monthly pass, shall be issued a refund of the amounts so 18 prepaid. 19 (iv) Any order issued pursuant to this section, whether imposing a ban 20 or modifying one, shall be served on the appropriate public transporta- 21 tion or public transit entity as directed by the court. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.